data/lexd/50-function-words.lexd
LEXICON FuncWords
adder<Cjn>:adder
be<Cjn>:be
bītai<Pcl>:bītai
bītan<Pcl>:bītan
eb<Pr>:eb
en<Pr>:en
ep<Pr>:ep
et<Pr>:et
ezze<Pr>:ezze
ik<Pcl>:ik
iz<Pr>:iz
jāu<Pcl>:jāu
kai<Cjn>:kai
kwēi<Pcl>:kwēi
na<Pcl>:na
ni<Pcl>:ni
no<Pr>:no
pa<Pr>:pa
per<Pr>:per
pir<Pr>:pir
po<Pr>:po
pra<Pr>:pra
pre<Pr>:pre
prei<Pr>:prei
pēr<Pr>:pēr
sen<Pr>:sen
stwi<Pcl>:stwi
sēn<Pr>:sēn
te<Pcl>:te
tin<Pcl>:tin
tēr<Pr>:tēr
tīt<Pcl>:tīt
īr<Pcl>:īr
